hr-HR: Elektronika > Ispis, kopiranje, skeniranje i faksiranje > Skeneri > Skeneri s listovima: Skeneri za čekove; Skeneri za osobne iskaznice; Nadglavni skeneri za knjige
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Εκτύπωση, Αντιγραφή, Σάρωση & Φαξ > Σαρωτές > Σαρωτές με τροφοδοσία φύλλων: Σαρωτές επιταγών; Σαρωτές ταυτοτήτων; Επιτραπέζιοι σαρωτές βιβλίων
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > In, photocopy, quét & fax > Máy quét > Máy quét nạp giấy tự động: Máy quét séc; Máy quét thẻ ID; Máy quét sách trên đầu
ru: Электроника > Печать, копирование, сканирование и работа с факсами > Сканеры > Протяжные сканеры: Сканеры чеков; Сканеры удостоверений личности; Планшетные книжные сканеры
bg-BG: Електроника > Печат, копиране, сканиране и факс > Скенери > Документни скенери: Скенери за чекове; Скенери за лични карти; Скенери за книги с горно разположение
sl-SI: Elektronika > Tiskanje, kopiranje, skeniranje in faksiranje > Optični bralniki > Optični bralniki z avtomatskim podajalnikom dokumentov: Skenerji čekov; Skenerji osebnih izkaznic; Nadglavni knjižni skenerji
tr: Elektronik > Yazıcı, Fotokopi, Tarayıcı ve Faks > Tarayıcılar > Sayfa Beslemeli Tarayıcılar: Çek Tarayıcıları; Kimlik Kartı Tarayıcıları; Üstten Kitap Tarayıcıları
it: Elettronica > Stampa, copia, scansione e fax > Scanner > Scanner a fogli: Scanner di assegni; Scanner di carte d'identità; Scanner per libri overhead
nl: Elektronica > Afdrukken, kopiëren, scannen en faxen > Scanners > Scanners met velleninvoer: Chequescanners; Id-kaartscanners; Overhead boekscanners
sk-SK: Elektronika > Tlač, kopírovanie, skenovanie a faxovanie > Skenery > Listové skenery: Skenery šekov; Skenery preukazov; Stojankové skenery kníh
lt-LT: Elektronika > Spausdinimas, kopijavimas, nuskaitymas ir faksas > Skaitytuvai > Skaitytuvai su lapų tiektuvais: Čekių skaitytuvai; Tapatybės kortelių skaitytuvai; Viršutiniai knygų skaitytuvai
ja: 電子機器 > プリンター・コピー機 > スキャナー > シートフィードスキャナー: 小切手スキャナー; IDカードスキャナー; オーバーヘッド型ブックスキャナー
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > พิมพ์ คัดลอก สแกน และแฟกซ์ > สแกนเนอร์ > เครื่องสแกนแบบเลื่อนกระดาษ: เครื่องสแกนเช็ค; เครื่องสแกนบัตรประชาชน; เครื่องสแกนหนังสือแบบบน
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Leitores > Scanners de alimentação de folhas: Scanners de cheques; Scanners de cartões de identificação; Scanners aéreos de livros
es: Electrónica > Fax, escáner, copiadora e impresora > Escáneres > Escáneres de alimentación de hojas: Escáneres de cheques; Escáneres de tarjetas de identificación; Escáneres de libros cenitales
da: Elektronik > Udskriv, kopiér, scan og fax > Scannere > Arkfødede scannere: Checkscannere; ID-kortscannere; Overhead-bogscannere
pl: Elektronika > Drukowanie, kopiowanie, skanowanie i faksowanie > Skanery > Skanery z podajnikiem: Skanery czeków; Skanery kart identyfikacyjnych; Skanery książek nasobne
cs: Elektronika > Tisk, kopírování, skenování a faxování > Skenery > Skenery s podavačem: Skenery šeků; Skenery průkazů; Horní knižní skenery
nb: Elektronikk > Utskrift, kopi, skann og faks > Skannere > Arkmatede skannere: Sjekkskannere; ID-kortskannere; Bokskannere med overlyskamera
fr: Appareil électronique > Impression, copie, numérisation et télécopie > Scanners > Scanners à défilement: Scanners de chèques; Scanners de cartes d’identité; Scanners de livres à caméra aérienne
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Impressão, cópia, digitalização e fax > Scanners > Scanners alimentados por folhas: Scanners de cheques; Scanners de cartão de identificação; Scanners de livros aéreos
en: Electronics > Print, Copy, Scan & Fax > Scanners > Sheetfed Scanners: Check Scanners; ID Card Scanners; Overhead Book Scanners
ro-RO: Electronice > Imprimare, copiere, scanare și fax > Scanere > Scanere pentru documente: Scanere pentru cecuri; Scanere pentru cărți de identitate; Scanere aeriene pentru cărți
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 打印/复印/扫描/传真 > 扫描仪 > 馈纸式扫描仪: 支票扫描仪; 身份证扫描仪; 高架式书本扫描仪
sv: Elektronik > Utskrift, kopiering, skanning och fax > Skannrar > Arkmatade skannrar: Checkskannrar; ID-kortskannrar; Bokskannrar över huvudet
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 多功能事務機 > 掃描器 > 饋紙型掃描器: 支票掃描器; 身份證掃描器; 書籍俯視掃描儀
fi: Elektroniikka > Tulostus, kopiointi, skannaus ja faksaus > Skannerit > Arkinsyöttöskannerit: Sekkiskanneri; Henkilötunnistekorttiskanneri; Pystysuora kirjaskanneri
hu: Elektronika > Nyomtatás, másolás, szkennelés és faxolás > Szkennerek > Lapolvasók: Csekkszkennerek; Igazolványszkennerek; Felülnézetikönyv-szkennerek
ko: 전자기기 > 인쇄/ 복사/스캔/팩스 > 스캐너 > 시트 피드 스캐너: 수표 스캐너; 신분증 스캐너; 오버헤드 북 스캐너
de: Elektronik > Drucken, Kopieren, Scannen & Faxen > Scanner > Bogenscanner: Scheckscanner; ID-Kartenscanner; Overhead-Buchscanner